Utah statutes.
63G-12-106.   Severability.

(1)  If a provision of Part 2, Guest Worker Program, or the application of a provision to a person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter may not be given effect without the invalid provision or application so that the provisions of this chapter are not severable.

(2)  The following provisions are severable from this chapter:

(a)  Title 76, Chapter 9, Part 10, Illegal Immigration Enforcement Act;

(b)  Section 76-10-2901; and

(c)  Section 77-7-2.

